Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-169
Proceeds and expenses.

(RULLCA 906) (a) Except
as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section:

(1) any proceeds or other
benefits of a derivative action under section 21-165, whether by judgment,
compromise, or settlement, belong to the limited liability company and not
to the plaintiff; and

(2)
if the plaintiff receives any proceeds, the plaintiff shall remit them immediately
to the company.

(b)
If a derivative action under section 21-165 is successful in whole or in part,
the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable
attorney's fees and costs, from the recovery of the limited liability company.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 69.